Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2314.01
Transition-to-practice agreement, defined.

Transition-to-practice agreement means a collaborative agreement for two thousand hours of initial practice between a nurse practitioner and a supervising provider which provides for the delivery of health care through a collaborative practice and which meets the requirements of section 38-2322.

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 21;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 39;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 54;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1716.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 802;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 38-2310;

Laws 2015, LB107, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 76.